Nebraska, session 109, LB576.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB576 LB576
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 86-457, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-457 (1) Each wireless carrier shall collect a :(a) A surcharge of
up to one dollar seventy cents, except as provided in subdivision (1)(b)
of this subsection, on all active telephone numbers or functional
equivalents every month from users of wireless service and shall remit
the surcharge in accordance with section 86-459 ; or (b) A surcharge of
up to fifty cents on all active telephone numbers or functional
equivalents every month from users of wireless service whose primary
place of use is in a county containing a city of the metropolitan class
and shall remit the surcharge in accordance with section 86-459. The
wireless carrier is not liable for any surcharge not paid by a customer.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the wireless
carrier shall add the surcharge to each user's billing statement. The
surcharge shall appear as a separate line-item charge on the user's
billing statement and shall be labeled as "Enhanced Wireless 911
Surcharge" or a reasonable abbreviation of such phrase.
(3) If a wireless carrier, except as otherwise provided in this
section, resells its service through other entities, each reseller shall
collect the surcharge from its customers and shall remit the surcharge in
accordance with section 86-459.
(4) The surcharges authorized by this section shall not apply to
prepaid wireless telecommunications service as defined in section 86-902.
(5) This section shall not apply to users who have no 911 service.
Sec. 2. Section 86-458, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-458 The commission shall hold a public hearing annually to
determine the amount of revenue necessary to carry out the Enhanced
Wireless 911 Services Act and the 911 Service System Act. After the
hearing, the commission shall determine the amount of money to be
deposited in the 911 Service System Fund for the following year to
-2-

LB576 LB576
2025 2025
maximize operational support for all public safety answering points in
the state and shall set the surcharge subject to the limitation in
section 86-457.
Sec. 3. Section 86-903, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-903 (1) The Department of Revenue shall determine the prepaid
wireless surcharge annually, effective January 1, based on the charges
described in subsection (2) of this section as in effect on the preceding
July 1. The department shall provide not less than ninety days' advance
notice of any change in the prepaid wireless surcharge on the
department's website.
(2) The rate of the prepaid wireless surcharge shall be the sum of
the following three percentages, rounded up to the nearest tenth of one
percent:
(a) The percentage obtained by dividing (i) the amount of the
wireless E-911 surcharge authorized under subsection (1) subdivision (1)
(b) of section 86-457 by (ii) fifty;
(b) The percentage obtained by dividing (i) the amount of the
Nebraska Telecommunications Relay System Fund surcharge set by the Public
Service Commission pursuant to the Telecommunications Relay System Act by
(ii) fifty; and
(c) The percentage obtained by multiplying (i) the Nebraska
Telecommunications Universal Service Fund surcharge percentage rate set
by the Public Service Commission by (ii) one minus the Federal
Communications Commission safe harbor percentage for determining the
interstate portion of a fixed monthly wireless charge.
(3) The Department of Revenue shall provide the Public Service
Commission with prepaid wireless surcharge calculation and collection
data upon request by the commission.
(4) Beginning January 1, 2013, each seller shall collect the prepaid
wireless surcharge from the consumer with respect to each retail
-3-

LB576 LB576
2025 2025
transaction occurring in this state. The seller shall disclose the amount
of the prepaid wireless surcharge either separately on an invoice,
receipt, or other similar document that is provided to the consumer by
the seller or otherwise. A retail transaction that is effected in person
by a consumer at a business location of the seller shall be treated as
occurring in this state if that business location is in this state, and
any other retail transaction shall be treated as occurring in this state
if the retail transaction is treated as occurring in this state for
purposes of section 77-2703.
(5) The prepaid wireless surcharge is the liability of the consumer
and not of the seller or of any provider, except that the seller shall be
liable to remit all prepaid wireless surcharges that the seller collects
from consumers as provided in section 86-904, including all such charges
that the seller is deemed to collect when the amount of the charge has
not been separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar
document provided to the consumer by the seller.
(6) The amount of the prepaid wireless surcharge that is collected
by a seller from a consumer, whether or not such amount is separately
stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document provided to the
consumer by the seller, shall not be included in the base for measuring
any tax, fee, surcharge, or other charge that is imposed by this state,
any political subdivision of this state, or any intergovernmental agency.
(7) For purposes of subsection (4) of this section, when prepaid
wireless telecommunications service is sold with one or more other
products or services for a single, non-itemized price, the seller shall
elect to treat the price of the prepaid wireless telecommunications
service (a) as such entire non-itemized price, (b) if the amount of
prepaid wireless telecommunications service is disclosed to the consumer
as a dollar amount, as such dollar amount, or (c) if the retailer can
identify the portion of the price that is attributable to the prepaid
wireless telecommunications service by reasonable and verifiable
-4-

LB576 LB576
2025 2025
standards from its books and records that are kept in the regular course
of business for other purposes, including, but not limited to, nontax
purposes, as such portion. If the amount of prepaid wireless
telecommunications service is denominated as ten minutes or less or as
five dollars or less, the seller may elect not to collect any prepaid
wireless surcharge with respect to the retail transaction.
Sec. 4. Original sections 86-457, 86-458, and 86-903, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-